North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE X COUNTY AND TOWNSHIP ORGANIZATION

Section 166.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 2.

Section 167.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 3.

Section 168.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 4.

Section 169.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 5.

Section 170.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 6.

Section 171.

Repealed by art. amd. 55, approved June 25, 1940 (S.L. 1941, p. 588). The section as originally adopted read:

In any county that shall have adopted a system of government by the chairmen of the several township boards, the question of continuing the same may be submitted to the electors of such county at a general election in such a manner as may be provided
by law, and if a majority of all the votes cast upon such question, shall be against said system of government, then such system shall cease in said county and the affairs of said county shall then be transacted by a board of county
commissioners as is now provided by the laws of the territory of Dakota.

Section 172.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 7.

Section 173.

Renumbered as Article VII, § 8.